District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Personal Delivery Device Weight Limit Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Personal Delivery Device Act of 2018, effective July 17, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-
137; D.C. Official Code § 50-110.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(8)(B) (D.C. Official Code § 50-110.01(8)(B)) is repealed.
(b) Section 4(b) (D.C. Official Code § 50-110.03(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
“(6) Not exceed 275 pounds in weight, excluding any property being carried by
the PDD, or a higher weight limit established by the Department through rulemaking.”.
Sec. 3. The Personal Delivery Device Weight Limit Temporary Amendment Act of 2026,
effective August 20, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-175; 73 DCR 9417), is repealed.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2